Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6119XS (3) 91 lh/jh S.F. 2352 Section 1. Section 562A.27A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. Notwithstanding section 562A.27 or 648.3 , if a tenant has 3 created or maintained a threat constituting a clear and present 4 danger to the health or safety of other tenants, the landlord, 5 the landlordâs employee or agent, or other persons on or within 6 one thousand feet of the landlordâs property, the landlord, 7 after the service of a single three daysâ written notice of 8 termination and notice to quit stating the specific activity 9 causing the clear and present danger, and setting forth the 10 language of subsection 3 which includes certain exemption 11 provisions available to the tenant, may file suit against the 12 tenant for recovery of possession of the premises pursuant to 13 chapter 648 or recover possession of the premises pursuant 14 to subsection 4 , in either case except as otherwise provided 15 in subsection 3 . The If the landlord files suit pursuant to 16 chapter 648, the petition shall state the incident or incidents 17 giving rise to the notice of termination and notice to quit . 18 The , and the tenant shall be given the opportunity to contest 19 the termination in the court proceedings by notice thereof at 20 least three days prior to the hearing. 21 Sec. 2. Section 562A.27A, Code 2026, is amended by adding 22 the following new subsection: 23 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. a. If a peace officer determines that 24 the tenant has presented a clear and present danger to the 25 health or safety of other tenants, the landlord, the landlordâs 26 employees or agents, or other persons on or within one thousand 27 feet of the landlordâs property as described under subsection 28 2, and that an exception under subsection 3 does not exist, 29 the peace officer shall, in writing, swear and affirm such 30 facts under penalty of providing false information. The peace 31 officer shall provide the written affirmation to the landlord. 32 b. If after the three-day notice period described under 33 subsection 1 the tenant is still in possession of the premises, 34 the landlord may request that a peace officer remove the tenant 35 -1- LSB 6119XS (3) 91 lh/jh 1/ 4 S.F. 2352 and any other persons occupying the premises, and the peace 1 officer shall do so as if an order for removal had been ordered 2 by a court. A court order shall not be required for the peace 3 officer to take action pursuant to this paragraph. 4 c. A peace officer shall be immune from civil liability for 5 any action taken in good faith pursuant to this subsection. 6 d. For purposes of this subsection, âpeace officerâ means 7 the same as defined in section 801.4. 8 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 648.5A Residential property ââ maximum 9 duration of action. 10 1. a. In an action for forcible entry and detainer 11 brought under this chapter relating to residential property, 12 notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no 13 more than thirty days shall pass between the date the notice 14 to quit is served and the issuance of the order to quit, if 15 applicable. 16 b. A court shall not toll or extend the time period 17 described in paragraph âaâ unless expressly authorized by 18 statute. 19 c. Procedural defects in a forcible entry and detainer 20 action that do not materially prejudice a tenant shall not 21 invalidate such action. 22 d. The supreme court shall adopt court rules to ensure 23 that forcible entry and detainer actions are conducted in a 24 streamlined manner that limit continuances and procedural 25 delays that are not required by due process. 26 2. This section shall be construed to prioritize the 27 prompt return of residential property to lawful occupancy and 28 productive use. 29 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to actions 30 commenced on or after July 1, 2026. 31